Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-556
Newborn; critical congenital heart
disease screening; responsibilities.

(1) All newborns in this state shall undergo
critical congenital heart disease screening in accordance with standards determined
in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

(2) For deliveries in
a birthing facility, the birthing facility shall develop and implement policies
to cause the screening of the newborn and the reporting of the results to
the newborn's health care provider in accordance with standards adopted pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) For deliveries that are planned outside
of a birthing facility, the prenatal care provider shall inform the parent
of the importance of critical congenital heart disease screening and the requirement
for all newborns to be screened. The parent shall be responsible for causing
the screening to be performed within the period and in the manner prescribed
by the department.

(4) For a birth that does not take place in a birthing facility,
whether or not there is a prenatal care provider, and the newborn is not admitted
to a birthing facility, the person registering such birth shall be responsible
for obtaining critical congenital heart disease screening for the newborn
within the period and in the manner prescribed by the department.

Laws 2013, LB225, § 4.
September 6, 2013